District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.02

Service of process; subpoenas.

(a)

By acting as an athlete agent in the District of Columbia, a nonresident individual appoints the Mayor as the individual’s agent for service of process in any civil action in the District of Columbia related to the individual’s acting as an athlete agent in the District of Columbia.

(b)

The Mayor may issue subpoenas for any material that is relevant to the administration of this part.

History

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.